Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.351

Application of RCW 35.23.352 to certain agreements relating to water pollution control, solid waste handling facilities.

RCW 35.23.352 does not apply to the selection of persons or entities to construct or develop water pollution control facilities or to provide water pollution control services under RCW 70A.140.040 or the selection of persons or entities to construct or develop solid waste handling facilities or to provide solid waste handling services under RCW 35.21.156.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1013; 1989 c 399 s 5; 1986 c 244 s 10.]